California, session 20252026, AB2113.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) New and emerging technologies, including unmanned aircraft (drones), pose an evolving risk to public safety, particularly at large-scale live entertainment and sporting events involving dense crowds that are central to the state’s economy and the enjoyment of its residents.(b) The continued vitality of outdoor live entertainment and major sporting events in the state depends on the ability to protect attendees, artists, athletes, and event personnel from any risks that may be posed by unauthorized or unsafe drone operations.(c) The state is home to marquee events and upcoming global gatherings, including the 2028 Summer Olympics, Olympic and Paralympic Games, 2026 FIFA World Cup, Super Bowl LX, and major live entertainment festivals such as Coachella Valley Music and Arts Festival, BottleRock Napa Valley, La Onda, Stagecoach Festival, Beyond Wonderland SoCal, Aftershock Festival, and numerous other events that attract hundreds of thousands of attendees annually.SEC. 2. Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 21750) is added to Division 9 of the Public Utilities Code, to read:PART 1.5. Unmanned Aircraft Systems21750. For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:(a) “Ticketed entertainment event” means any professional music, sporting, or performing arts event that meets all of the following requirements: (1) It is held in an entertainment venue with the capacity to hold 1,000 or more attendees with gated entries or barriers that prevent access to the general public.(2) A revocable license that has been issued by the venue operator of the entertainment venue is required for attendance at the event.(3) It is not covered by Federal Aviation Administration restrictions.(b) “Unmanned aircraft” has the same meaning as defined in Section 853.5 of the Government Code.(c) “Venue operator” means any person who owns, operates, manages, or controls an entertainment venue.21752. (a) It is unlawful to operate an unmanned aircraft within 400 feet of an outdoor ticketed entertainment event.(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a person who operates an unmanned aircraft under either of the following circumstances:(1) The person (A) has obtained consent from the venue operator for the ticketed entertainment event, or (B) is an employee of the entertainment venue where the ticketed entertainment event is held and is conducting official business.(2) The person is an employee of a water, sewer, electrical, telephone, cable, or other regulated utility service provider and is conducting official business.(c) A violation of this section is an infraction. Each violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500).(d) This section shall not be interpreted to prohibit a firefighter, peace officer, medical personnel, or other emergency personnel in the performance of their fire suppression, law enforcement, or emergency response duties from using an unmanned aircraft within 400 feet of an outdoor ticketed entertainment event.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.